Utah statutes.
32A-11a-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Affected party" means a supplier or wholesaler who is a party to a distributorship agreement that a terminating party seeks to terminate or not renew.

(2) (a)  "Distributorship agreement" means any written contract, agreement, or arrangement between a supplier and a wholesaler pursuant to which the wholesaler has the right to purchase, resell, and distribute in a designated geographical area any brand of beer manufactured, imported, or distributed by the supplier.

(b)  A separate agreement between a supplier and a wholesaler that relates to the relationship between the supplier and the wholesaler or the duties of either of them under a distributorship agreement is considered to be part of the distributorship agreement for purposes of this chapter.

(c)  A distributorship agreement may be for a definite or indefinite period.

(3)  "Good cause" means the material failure by a supplier or a wholesaler to comply with an essential, reasonable, and lawful requirement imposed by a distributorship agreement if the failure occurs after the supplier or wholesaler acting in good faith provides notice of deficiency and an opportunity to correct in accordance with Sections 32A-11a-103 and 32A-11a-104.

(4)  "Good faith" is as defined in Subsection 70A-1a-201(2)(t).

(5)  "Retailer" means a person subject to license under Chapter 10, Beer Retailer Licenses.

(6)  "Sales territory" means the geographic area of distribution and sale responsibility designated by a distributorship agreement.

(7)  "Supplier," notwithstanding Section 32A-1-105, means a brewer or other person who sells beer to a wholesaler for resale in this state.

(8)  "Terminating party" means a supplier or wholesaler who:

(a)  is a party to a distributorship agreement; and

(b)  seeks to terminate or not renew the distributorship agreement.

